Utah statutes.
78B-5-704.   Certification of affidavits taken before foreign court or judge.

When an affidavit is taken before a judge or court in another state or territory, or in a foreign country, the genuineness of the signature of the judge, the existence of the court, and the fact that the judge is a member of the court, shall be certified by the clerk of the court under the court's seal.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

